test/src/morphology/N-koonim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kǭņim: # Noun 155 'eng /est sang/fin' - full paradigm
     kǭņim+N+Sg+Nom: kǭņim
     kǭņim+N+Sg+Gen: kǭņim
     kǭņim+N+Sg+Par: kǭņimt
     kǭņim+N+Sg+Dat: kǭņimõn
     kǭņim+N+Sg+Ins: kǭņimõks
     kǭņim+N+Sg+Ill: kǭņimõ
     kǭņim+N+Sg+Ela: kǭņimõst
     kǭņim+N+Pl+Nom: kaņmõd
     kǭņim+N+Pl+Gen: kaņmõd
     kǭņim+N+Pl+Par: kaņmidi
     kǭņim+N+Pl+Dat: kaņmõdõn
     kǭņim+N+Pl+Ins: kaņmõdõks
     kǭņim+N+Pl+Ill: kaņmiž
     kǭņim+N+Pl+Ela: kaņmist
